District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.58

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 758
as added May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-303, § 2(d), 60 DCR 2711
This section is referenced in § 3-1207.52.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-303 added this section.